Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1720
Self-sufficiency contract; contents.

The responsibilities, roles, and expectations of the applicant family, the case manager, and all other service providers shall be detailed in the self-sufficiency contract developed under section 68-1719. The contract shall be signed by the applicant and by the case manager representing the state. The state and the applicant shall fulfill their respective terms of the contract.

Laws 1994, LB 1224, § 20.